apertium-kmr.kmr.dix
    <pardef n="bibez/î__vblex">
	<e><p><l></l><r><s n="fut"/></r></p><par n="bik/e__vblex"/></e>
	<e><p><l></l><r><s n="prs"/></r></p><par n="bik/e__vblex"/></e>
        <e><p><l>iyama</l><r><s n="fpi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>iyayî</l><r><s n="fpi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>iya</l><r><s n="fpi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>iyana</l><r><s n="fpi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>iyana</l><r><s n="fpi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>iyana</l><r><s n="fpi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e> 
        <e><p><l>iyama</l><r><s n="opt"/><s n="narr"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>iyayî</l><r><s n="opt"/><s n="narr"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>iya</l><r><s n="opt"/><s n="narr"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>iyana</l><r><s n="opt"/><s n="narr"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>iyana</l><r><s n="opt"/><s n="narr"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>iyana</l><r><s n="opt"/><s n="narr"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e> 
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="bibez/î__vblex_iv">
        <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/></r></p><par n="bibez/î__vblex"/></e> 
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="kir/î__vblex_tv">
        <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/></r></p><par n="bez/î__vblex"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="dikir/î__vblex_tv">
	<e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="prog"/></r></p><par n="bez/î__vblex"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="bikir/î__vblex_tv">
        <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/></r></p><par n="bibez/î__vblex"/></e> 
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="/danîn__vblex_tv">
        <e><p><l>danîm</l><r>danîn<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>danî</l><r>danîn<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>danî</l><r>danîn<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>danîn</l><r>danîn<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>danîn</l><r>danîn<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>danîn</l><r>danîn<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e> 
        <e><p><l>danîme</l><r>danîn<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="narr"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>daniye</l><r>danîn<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="narr"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>danye</l><r>danîn<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="narr"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>danîne</l><r>danîn<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="narr"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>danîne</l><r>danîn<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="narr"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>danîne</l><r>danîn<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="narr"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e> 
        <e><p><l>datîn</l><r>danîn<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/></r></p><par n="dik/e__vblex"/></e>
        <e><p><l>didanîm</l><r>danîn<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="prog"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>didanî</l><r>danîn<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="prog"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>didanî</l><r>danîn<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="prog"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>didanîn</l><r>danîn<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="prog"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>didanîn</l><r>danîn<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="prog"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>didanîn</l><r>danîn<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="prog"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e> 
        <e><p><l>didanîme</l><r>danîn<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="prog"/><s n="narr"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>didanîye</l><r>danîn<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="prog"/><s n="narr"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>didanîye</l><r>danîn<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="prog"/><s n="narr"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>didanîne</l><r>danîn<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="prog"/><s n="narr"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>didanîne</l><r>danîn<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="prog"/><s n="narr"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>didanîne</l><r>danîn<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="prog"/><s n="narr"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e> 
<!--   <e><p><l>dîn</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/></r></p><par n="bik/e__vblex"/></e>
        <e><p><l>dên</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/></r></p><par n="bik/e__vblex"/></e>
        <e><p><l>deyn</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/></r></p><par n="bik/e__vblex"/></e>-->
    </pardef> 

    <pardef n="kir/__vblex_tv">
        <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/></r></p><par n="kir/__vblex"/></e>
        <e><p><l></l><r></r></p><par n="plu_tv"/></e>
        <e><p><l>ime</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="narr"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>iyî</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="narr"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>iye</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="narr"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ine</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="narr"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ine</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="narr"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ine</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="narr"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e> 
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="dikir/__vblex_tv">
        <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="prog"/></r></p><par n="kir/__vblex"/></e>
        <e><p><l>ime</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="prog"/><s n="narr"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>iyî</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="prog"/><s n="narr"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>iye</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="prog"/><s n="narr"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ine</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="prog"/><s n="narr"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ine</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="prog"/><s n="narr"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ine</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="prog"/><s n="narr"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e> 
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="bikir/__vblex">
        <e><p><l>ima</l><r><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ayî</l><r><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>a</l><r><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ana</l><r><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ana</l><r><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ana</l><r><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e> 
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="bikir/__vblex_tv">
        <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="opt"/></r></p><par n="bikir/__vblex"/></e>
    </pardef>


    <pardef n="dik/e__vblex_tv">
        <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/></r></p><par n="dik/e__vblex"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="bik/e__vblex_tv">
        <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/></r></p><par n="bik/e__vblex"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="nekir/__vblex_tv">
        <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="neg"/></r></p><par n="kir/__vblex"/></e>
        <e><p><l></l><r></r></p><par n="plu_neg_tv"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="nak/e__vblex_tv">
        <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="neg"/></r></p><par n="dik/e__vblex"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="nek/e__vblex_tv">
        <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="neg"/></r></p><par n="bik/e__vblex"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="dişo/__vblex_tv">
        <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/></r></p><par n="dişo/__vblex"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="têxistin" r="LR"><p><l>tê<b/>nax</l><r>têxistin</r></p><par n="nak/e__vblex_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="zewicandin"><p><l>dizewicîn</l><r>zewicandin</r></p><par n="dik/e__vblex_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="birêxistinkirin" r="LR"><p><l>birêxistin<b/>kir</l><r>birêxistinkirin</r></p><par n="kir/__vblex_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="birêxistinkirin" r="LR"><p><l>birêxistin<b/>bik</l><r>birêxistinkirin</r></p><par n="bik/e__vblex_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="birêxistinkirin" r="LR"><p><l>birêxistin<b/>nek</l><r>birêxistinkirin</r></p><par n="nek/e__vblex_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="dardekirin"><p><l>dardenekir</l><r>dardekirin</r></p><par n="nekir/__vblex_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="nîşankirin"><p><l>nîşannak</l><r>nîşankirin</r></p><par n="nak/e__vblex_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="raxistin"><p><l>radix</l><r>raxistin</r></p><par n="dik/e__vblex_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="werkirin"><p><l>werkir</l><r>werkirin</r></p><par n="kir/__vblex_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="werkirin"><p><l>werbik</l><r>werkirin</r></p><par n="bik/e__vblex_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="werkirin"><p><l>wernek</l><r>werkirin</r></p><par n="nek/e__vblex_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="dagerîn"><p><l>dabiger</l><r>dagerîn</r></p><par n="bibez/î__vblex_iv"/></e>
    <e lm="tevgerîn"><p><l>tevbiger</l><r>tevgerîn</r></p><par n="bibez/î__vblex_iv"/></e>
    <e lm="libergerîn"><p><l>liberbiger</l><r>libergerîn</r></p><par n="bibez/î__vblex_iv"/></e>
    <e lm="êşîn"><p><l>biêş</l><r>êşîn</r></p><par n="bibez/î__vblex_iv"/></e>
    <e lm="herikîn"><p><l>biherik</l><r>herikîn</r></p><par n="bibez/î__vblex_iv"/></e>
    <e lm="şibîn"><p><l>şib</l><r>şibîn</r></p><par n="kir/î__vblex_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="şibîn"><p><l>dişib</l><r>şibîn</r></p><par n="dikir/î__vblex_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="şibîn"><p><l>bişib</l><r>şibîn</r></p><par n="bikir/î__vblex_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="kirîn"><p><l>kir</l><r>kirîn</r></p><par n="kir/î__vblex_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="kirîn"><p><l>dikir</l><r>kirîn</r></p><par n="dikir/î__vblex_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="kirîn"><p><l>bikir</l><r>kirîn</r></p><par n="bikir/î__vblex_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="danîn"><p><l></l><r></r></p><par n="/danîn__vblex_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="hûrkirin"><p><l>hûrnekir</l><r>hûrkirin</r></p><par n="nekir/__vblex_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="lêkirin" r="LR"><p><l>lê<b/>nak</l><r>lêkirin</r></p><par n="nak/e__vblex_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="binçavkirin" r="LR"><p><l>binçav<b/>dik</l><r>binçavkirin</r></p><par n="dik/e__vblex_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="pêve kirin" r="LR"><p><l>pêvekir</l><r>pêve<b/>kirin</r></p><par n="kir/__vblex_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="pêve kirin" r="LR"><p><l>pêvebik</l><r>pêve<b/>kirin</r></p><par n="bik/e__vblex_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="pêve kirin" r="LR"><p><l>pêvenek</l><r>pêve<b/>kirin</r></p><par n="nek/e__vblex_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="navkirin"><p><l>navnekir</l><r>navkirin</r></p><par n="nekir/__vblex_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="şil kirin" r="LR"><p><l>şilnak</l><r>şil<b/>kirin</r></p><par n="nak/e__vblex_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="çapkirin" r="LR"><p><l>çap<b/>dik</l><r>çapkirin</r></p><par n="dik/e__vblex_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="xwedîkirin"><p><l>xwedî<b/>kir</l><r>xwedîkirin</r></p><par n="kir/__vblex_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="xwedîkirin"><p><l>xwedî<b/>bik</l><r>xwedîkirin</r></p><par n="bik/e__vblex_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="xwedîkirin"><p><l>xwedî<b/>nek</l><r>xwedîkirin</r></p><par n="nek/e__vblex_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="lidarxistin"><p><l>lidardixist</l><r>lidarxistin</r></p><par n="dikir/__vblex_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="kirin"><p><l>dikir</l><r>kirin</r></p><par n="dikir/__vblex_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="kirin"><p><l>bikir</l><r>kirin</r></p><par n="bikir/__vblex_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="binavkirin"><p><l>binavdikir</l><r>binavkirin</r></p><par n="dikir/__vblex_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="valakirin"><p><l>nekir</l><r>kirin</r></p><par n="nekir/__vblex_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="tewandin"><p><l>tewand</l><r>tewandin</r></p><par n="kir/__vblex_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="gotin"><p><l>digot</l><r>gotin</r></p><par n="dikir/__vblex_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="şiştin"><p><l>dişo</l><r>şiştin</r></p><par n="dişo/__vblex_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="ajotin"><p><l>diajo</l><r>ajotin</r></p><par n="dişo/__vblex_tv"/></e>
